California statutes. Insurance Code
 shall be accompanied by a letter of attestation from the provider that the copies are true and correct copies of the documents received by the provider. Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from exercising its right to contest the validity of any policy.

(B) If the provider submits to the insurer a copy of independent evidence provided for in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) when the provider submits a request to the insurer to effect the transfer of the policy to the provider, the copy shall be deemed to establish that the settlement contract satisfies the requirements of this section.

(4) This prohibition shall apply only to policies issued on or after the effective date of this section.

(n) An insurer shall not:

(1) Engage in any
 transaction, act, or practice that restricts, limits, or impairs the lawful transfer of ownership, change of beneficiary, or assignment of a policy.

(2) Make any false or misleading statement for the purpose of dissuading an owner or insured from a lawful life settlement contract.

(o) No person providing premium financing shall receive any proceeds, fees, or other consideration from the policy or owner of the policy that are in addition to the amounts required to pay principal, interest, and any reasonable costs or expenses incurred by the lender or borrower in connection with the premium finance agreement, except for the event of a default, unless either the default on the loan or transfer of the policy occurs pursuant to an agreement or understanding with any other person for the purpose of evading regulation under this act.

(p) If there is more than one owner on a single policy, and the owners are residents of different states, the life settlement contract shall be governed by the law of the state in which the owner having the largest percentage ownership resides or, if the owners hold equal ownership, the state of residence of one owner agreed upon in writing by all of the owners. The law of the state of the insured shall govern in the event that equal owners fail to agree in writing upon a state of residence for jurisdictional purposes.

(q) A provider from this state who enters into a life settlement contract with an owner who is a resident of another state that has enacted statutes or adopted regulations governing life settlement contracts shall be governed in the effectuation of that life settlement contract by the statutes and regulations of the owner’s state of residence. If the state in which the owner is a resident has not enacted statutes or
 regulations governing life settlement contracts, the provider shall give the owner notice that neither state regulates the transaction upon which he or she is entering. For transactions in those states, however, the provider is to maintain all records required if the transactions were executed in the state of residence. The forms used in those states need not be approved by the department.

(r) If there is a conflict in the laws that apply to an owner and a purchaser in any individual transaction, the laws of the state that apply to the owner shall take precedence and the provider shall comply with those laws.

(s) It is a fraudulent life settlement act and a violation of this section for any person to do any of the following, or any of the acts listed in subdivision (g) of Section 10113.1:

(1) Enter into a life
 settlement contract if a person knows or reasonably should have known that the life insurance policy was obtained by means of a false, deceptive, or misleading application for the policy.

(2) Engage in any transaction, practice, or course of business if a person knows or reasonably should have known that the intent was to avoid the notice requirements of this section.

(3) Engage in any fraudulent act or practice in connection with any transaction relating to any settlement involving an owner who is a resident of this state.

(4) Fail to provide the disclosures or file the required reports with the commissioner as required by this act.

(5) Issue, solicit, or market, the purchase of a new life insurance policy for the purpose of, or with a primary emphasis
 on, settling the policy.

(6) Enter into a premium finance agreement with any person or agency, or any person affiliated with a person or agency that is prohibited under subdivision (o).

(7) With respect to any settlement contract or insurance policy and a broker, knowingly solicit an offer from, effectuate a life settlement contract with, or make a sale to any provider, financing entity, or related provider trust that is controlling, controlled by, or under common control with a broker, unless the relationship has been fully disclosed to the owner.

(8) With respect to any life settlement contract or insurance policy and a provider, knowingly enter into a life settlement contract with an owner, if, in connection with a life settlement contract, anything of value will be paid to a broker that is controlling, controlled
 by, or under common control with a provider or the financing entity, or related provider trust that is involved in a settlement contract, unless the relationship has been fully disclosed to the owner.

(9) With respect to a provider, enter into a life settlement contract unless the life settlement promotional, advertising, and marketing materials, as may be prescribed by regulation, have been filed with the commissioner. In no event shall any marketing materials expressly reference that the insurance is “free” for any period of time. The inclusion of any reference in the marketing materials that would cause an owner to reasonably believe that the insurance is free for any period of time shall be considered a violation of this act; or with respect to any life insurance producer, insurance company, broker, or provider make any statement or representation to the applicant or policyholder in connection with the sale or financing of a life insurance
 policy to the effect that the insurance is free or without cost to the policyholder for any period of time unless provided in the policy.

(t) Life settlement contracts and applications for life settlement contracts, regardless of the form of transmission, shall contain the following statement or a substantially similar statement:
“Any person who knowingly presents false information in an application for insurance or for a life settlement contract may be subject to criminal or civil liability.”
(1) The lack of a statement as required by this subdivision does not constitute a defense in any prosecution for a fraudulent life settlement act.

(2) This act shall not:

(A) Preempt the authority or relieve the duty of other law enforcement or regulatory agencies to investigate, examine, and prosecute suspected violations of law.

(B) Preempt, supersede, or limit any provision of any state securities law or any rule, order, or notice issued thereunder.

(C) Prevent or prohibit a person from disclosing voluntarily information concerning life settlement fraud to a law enforcement or regulatory agency other than the insurance department.

(D) Limit the powers granted elsewhere by the laws of this state to the commissioner or an insurance fraud unit to investigate and examine possible violations of law and to take appropriate action against wrongdoers.

(u) A
 provider lawfully transacting business in this state prior to the effective date of this act may continue to do so, pending approval or disapproval of that person’s application for a license as long as the application is filed with the commissioner not later than 30 days after publication by the commissioner of an application form and instructions for licensure of providers. If the publication of the application form and instructions is prior to the effective date of this chapter, then the filing of the application shall not be later than 30 days after the effective date of this act. During the time that an application is pending with the commissioner, the applicant may use any form of life settlement contract that has been filed with the commissioner pending approval thereof, provided that the form is otherwise in compliance with the provisions of this act. Any person transacting business in this state under this provision shall be obligated to comply with all other requirements of this act. A person who
 has lawfully acted as a broker and negotiated life settlement contracts between any owner residing in this state and one or more providers for at least one year immediately prior to the effective date of this act may continue to do so pending approval or disapproval of that person’s application for a license, as long as the application is filed with the commissioner not later than 30 days after publication by the commissioner of an application form and instructions for licensure of brokers. If the publication of the application form and instructions is prior to the effective date of this chapter, then the filing of the application shall not be later than 30 days after the effective date of this act. Any person transacting business in this state under this provision shall be obligated to comply with all other requirements of this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 343, Sec. 6.   (SB 98)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10113.35.

(a) The commissioner may adopt rules and regulations reasonably necessary to implement the provisions of this act.

(b) This section shall be prospective only, and nothing in the act adding this section shall be interpreted to interfere with or overrule regulations adopted prior to the effective date of this act by the Insurance Commissioner pursuant to the authority granted at the time those regulations were adopted.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 414, Sec. 5.   (AB 1425)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10113.4.

If a group life insurance policy contains a provision that makes a certificate holder’s coverage contestable on the grounds of suicide for a period following commencement of coverage, only the unexpired portion of that period shall be applied to a certificate holder’s individual conversion policy of an equal or lesser amount of coverage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 440, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

10113.5.

(a) An individual life insurance policy delivered or issued for delivery in this state shall contain a provision that it is incontestable after it has been in force, during the lifetime of the insured, for a period of not more than two years after its date of issue, except for nonpayment of premiums and except for any of the supplemental benefits described in Section 10271, to the extent that the contestability of those benefits is otherwise set forth in the policy or contract supplemental thereto. An individual life insurance policy, upon reinstatement, may be contested on account of fraud or misrepresentation of facts material to the reinstatement only for the same period following reinstatement, and with the same conditions and exceptions, as the policy provides with respect to contestability after original issuance.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if photographic identification is presented during the application process, and if an impostor is substituted for a named insured in any part of the application process, with or without the knowledge of the named insured, then no contract between the insurer and the named insured is formed, and any purported insurance contract is void from its inception.

(2) As used in this subdivision:

(A) “Application process” means any or all of the steps required of a named insured in applying for a certificate under an individual policy of life insurance, including, but not limited to, executing any part of the application form, submitting to medical or physical examination or testing, or providing a sample or specimen of blood, urine, or other bodily substance.

(B) “Impostor” means a person other than the named insured who participates in any manner in the application process for a certificate under an individual life insurance policy and represents himself or herself to be the named insured or represents that a sample or specimen of blood, urine, or other bodily substance is that of the named insured.

(C) “Named insured” means the individual named in an application form for a certificate under an individual life insurance policy as the person whose life is to be insured.

(c) This section shall not be construed to preclude at any time the assertion of defenses based upon policy provisions that exclude or restrict coverage.

(d) This section shall not apply to individual life insurance policies delivered or issued for delivery in this state on or before December 31, 1973.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 184, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10113.6.

(a) An insurer that is required to deliver a life insurance policy to the owner of the policy in order to start the period running during which the owner may exercise any statutory right to return a policy for cancellation, shall accomplish the delivery by:

(1) Registered or certified mail.

(2) Personal delivery, with a signed, written receipt of delivery.

(3) First-class mail, with a signed, written receipt of delivery.

(4) Other reasonable means, as determined by the commissioner.

(b) If an insurer does not deliver a policy by the means set forth in subdivision (a), the burden of proof shall be on the insurer to establish that the policy was delivered, in the event of a dispute with the owner of the policy.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), a policy shall be deemed to have been received six months after the date of issuance if premiums have been paid.

(d) An employer or corporate policy owner, or the plan trustee of an employer or corporate policy owner who controls 100 or more policies, shall have the option to request in writing from an insurer the delivery of a sample policy with one or more census pages in a form satisfactory to the employer, corporate policy owner, or plan trustee, as an alternative to the delivery requirements of subdivision (a). However, delivery of the sample policy and census page as provided in this subdivision shall be subject to the provisions of subdivisions (a) and (b). The insurer shall deliver all of the policies listed on the census page to the employer, corporate policy owner, or plan trustee within 30 days of demand for delivery. The delivery of the actual policies shall not institute a new “free look” period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 686, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10113.7.

(a) An increase of premium on an individual life insurance policy that provides for premium changes by the insurer is not effective unless written notice is delivered to the policyholder, or mailed to his or her last known address as shown by the records of the insurer, not less than 20 days prior to the effective date of the increase. If the notice is sent with or contained as part of an ordinary premium or renewal invoice or payment request, the notice of increase shall be prominently displayed and stated separately from the ordinary statement of the amount due.

(b) This section shall not apply to premium increases resulting directly from changes in coverage requested by the policyholder, or when the insurer has previously disclosed, in writing, either at the time the policy was issued or during the life of the contract, a specific date of change of premium, and the new premium amount.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit application of any other provision of law, nor shall it be construed to prevent application of any contractual provision affording greater rights to the policyholder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 791, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10113.70.

(a) (1) Whenever a flexible premium life insurance policy is subject to an adverse change in the current scale of nonguaranteed elements, as soon as practicable, but no later than 90 days before the effective date of the adverse change in the current scale of nonguaranteed elements, the insurer shall provide
 a summary notice and, if the policy is designated as one for which illustrations shall be used, an inforce illustration of current and future benefits and values. The illustration or illustrations shall be based on the insurer’s illustrated scale after the effective date of the adverse change in the current scale of nonguaranteed elements.

(2) An inforce illustration provided pursuant to this section shall comply with the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 10509.955 and subdivisions (a) and (e) of Section 10509.956.

(b) The summary notice shall be in no less than 12-point type, and the
 illustration and summary notice shall contain the following language in boldface type: “IMPORTANT: NOTICE OF CHANGE IN NONGUARANTEED ELEMENTS OF YOUR POLICY.”

(c) The summary notice shall include the information required by paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, and the language set forth in paragraphs (6) to (8), inclusive:

(1) The name of each nonguaranteed element in the current scale of nonguaranteed elements that is subject to an adverse change.

(2) The definition of each nonguaranteed element in the current scale of nonguaranteed elements that is subject to an adverse change.

(3) A statement identifying the
 current rate
 or charge for each nonguaranteed element and the new rate
 or charge for each nonguaranteed element, with reference to the current scale of nonguaranteed elements, including the percentage change in the nonguaranteed element that the adverse change represents.

(4) An explanation that the adverse change in the current scale of nonguaranteed elements is based on expectations of the future cost of providing the benefits under the policy, and that the adverse change to the current scale of nonguaranteed elements will reduce the accumulation value and may increase the risk of policy lapse based on continued payment of current premiums.

(5) The date the adverse change to the current scale of nonguaranteed elements will take effect.

(6) “Policy information:

Last policy anniversary date: ____

Next policy anniversary date: ____

Current accumulation value: ____

Current cash surrender value (accumulation value minus any surrender charges and policy loans): ____”

(7) “Your options:

Take no action: This option will reduce the accumulation of your policy. Additional premiums will be required at some point in order to maintain your coverage if not otherwise adequately funded to maintain coverage.

Pay additional premiums: You may choose to pay additional premiums starting now to maintain your policy’s accumulation value and death benefit coverage for the level and period anticipated before the increase.

Reduce the face value of your policy: If your policy is not already at the minimum value specified on your policy, you may choose to reduce the specified amount on your policy to a level that will be supported by the amount and years of the premium payments you would like to pay. Please note that reducing the specified amount may result in a surrender charge.

Surrender your policy: You may choose to
 surrender your policy for the current cash surrender value. Before you decide to surrender your policy, you should consult your tax, insurance, or financial advisor.

Convert your policy (applicable only if your policy includes a conversion or exchange privilege in the contract): If you wish to maintain life insurance coverage but are unable to pay increased premiums to keep your policy in force, you may choose to convert your flexible premium life insurance policy to a different type of life insurance policy we offer, subject to the terms of conversions listed in your policy, which may better suit your financial needs.”

(8) “We understand that you may have further questions about this change or the options available to you. You may call your agent or our customer service team at [insert customer
 service toll-free telephone number and hours of operation].”

(d) As used in this section:

(1) “Adverse change” means a change to the current scale of nonguaranteed elements that increases or may increase a charge, or reduces or may reduce a benefit to the policy owner, other than a change in a credited interest rate or an index account parameter based entirely on changes in the insurer’s expected investment income or hedging costs.

(2) “Current scale of nonguaranteed elements” means the nonguaranteed elements, as defined in subdivision (m) of Section 10509.953,
 that apply to a policy in the current year and in future years, unless changed by the insurer.

(3) “Index account parameter” means a feature impacting the net credited rate for an index account, such as participation rate, cap, or spread.

(e) This section does not prohibit an insurer from including additional information in the notice that is specific to the policy for which the notice is sent, so long as it meets the requirements of this section.

(f) This section does not apply to a corporate-owned life insurance policy permitted by Section 10110.4 under which all benefits are payable to the corporate policy owner.

(g) (1) This section shall apply to a flexible premium life insurance policy in effect on or after April 1, 2019.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the notice
 requirement of this section shall apply to an adverse change in the current scale of nonguaranteed elements that is scheduled to take effect on or after July 1, 2019.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the illustration requirement of this section shall apply to an adverse change in the current scale of nonguaranteed elements that is scheduled to take effect on or after July 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 545, Sec. 1.   (AB 2634)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10113.71.

(a) Each life insurance policy issued or delivered in this state shall contain a provision for a grace period of not less than 60 days from the premium due date. The 60-day grace period shall not run concurrently with the period of paid coverage. The provision shall provide that the policy shall remain in force during the grace period.

(b) (1) A notice of pending lapse and termination of a life insurance policy shall not be effective unless mailed by the insurer to the named policy owner, a designee named pursuant to Section 10113.72 for an individual life insurance policy, and a known assignee or other person having an interest in the individual life insurance policy, at least 30 days prior to the effective date of termination if
 termination is for nonpayment of premium.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply to nonrenewal.

(3) Notice shall be given to the policy owner and to the designee by first-class United States mail within 30 days after a premium is due and unpaid. However, notices made to assignees pursuant to this section may be done electronically with the consent of the assignee.

(c) For purposes of this section, a life insurance policy includes, but is not limited to, an individual life insurance policy and a group life insurance policy, except where otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 137.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10113.72.

(a) An individual life insurance policy shall not be issued or delivered in this state until the applicant has been given the right to designate at least one person, in addition to the applicant, to receive notice of lapse or termination of a policy for nonpayment of premium. The insurer shall provide each applicant with a form to make the designation. That form shall provide the opportunity for the applicant to submit the name, address, and telephone number of at least one person, in addition to the applicant, who is to receive notice of lapse or termination of the policy for nonpayment of premium.

(b) The insurer shall notify the
 policy owner annually of the right to change the written designation or designate one or more persons. The policy owner may change the designation more often if he or she chooses to do so.

(c) No individual life insurance policy shall lapse or be terminated for nonpayment of premium unless the insurer, at least 30 days prior to the effective date of the lapse or termination, gives notice to the policy owner and to the person or persons designated pursuant to subdivision (a), at the address provided by the policy owner for purposes of receiving notice of lapse or termination. Notice shall be given by first-class United States mail within 30 days after a premium is due and unpaid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 315, Sec. 2.   (AB 1747)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10113.8.

(a) Each health insurer that maintains an Internet Web site shall make a downloadable copy of the comparative benefit matrix prepared pursuant to Section 10127.14 available through a link on its site to the Internet Web sites of the department and the Department of Managed Health Care.

(b) Each health insurer shall send copies of the comparative benefit matrix on an annual basis, or more frequently as the matrix is updated by the department and the Department of Managed Health Care, to solicitors and solicitor firms and employers with whom it contracts. Each health insurer shall require its representatives and the solicitors and soliciting firms with which it contracts, to provide a copy of the comparative benefit matrix to individuals when presenting any benefit package for examination or sale.

(c) This section shall not apply to accident-only, specified disease, hospital indemnity, CHAMPUS supplement, long-term care, Medicare supplement, dental-only, or vision-only insurance policies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 164, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

10113.9.

(a) This section shall not apply to vision-only, dental-only, or CHAMPUS supplement insurance, or to hospital indemnity, hospital-only, accident-only, or specified disease insurance that does not pay benefits on a fixed benefit, cash payment only basis.

(b) (1) A change in the premium rate or coverage for an individual health insurance policy shall not become effective unless the insurer has provided a written notice of the change at least 10 days before the start of the annual enrollment period applicable to the policy or 60 days before the effective date of the policy renewal, whichever occurs earlier in the calendar year.

(2) The written notice required pursuant to paragraph
 (1) shall be provided to the individual policyholder at their last address known to the insurer. The notice shall state in italics and in 12-point type the actual dollar amount of the premium increase and the specific percentage by which the current premium will be increased. The notice shall describe in plain, understandable English any changes in the policy or any changes in benefits, including a reduction in benefits or changes to waivers, exclusions, or conditions, and highlight this information by printing it in italics. The notice shall specify in a minimum of 10-point bold typeface, the reason for a premium rate change or a change in coverage or benefits.

(c) (1) If the department determines that a rate is unreasonable or not justified consistent with Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 10181), the insurer shall notify the policyholder of this determination. This notification may be included in the notice required
 in subdivision (b). The notification to the policyholder shall be developed by the department. The development of the notification required under this subdivision shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(2) The notification to the policyholder shall include the following statements in 14-point type:

(A) The Department of Insurance has determined that the rate for this product is unreasonable or not justified after reviewing information submitted to it by the insurer.

(B) During the open enrollment period, the policyholder has the option to obtain other coverage from this insurer or another insurer, or to keep this coverage.

(C) The
 policyholder may want to contact Covered California at www.coveredca.com for help in understanding available options.

(D) Many Californians are eligible for financial assistance from Covered California to help pay for coverage.

(3) The insurer may include in the notification to the policyholder the internet website address at which the insurer’s final justification for implementing an increase that has been determined to be unreasonable by the commissioner may be found pursuant to Section 154.230 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(4) The notice shall also be provided to the agent of record for the policyholder, if any, so that the agent may assist the purchaser in finding other coverage.

(5) In developing the notification, the department
 shall take into consideration that this notice is required to be provided to an individual applicant pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 10181.3.

(d) (1) Before July 1, 2024, if an insurer rejects a dependent of a policyholder applying to be added to the policyholder’s individual grandfathered health plan, rejects an applicant for a Medicare supplement policy due to the applicant having end-stage renal disease, or offers an individual grandfathered health plan to an applicant at a rate that is higher than the standard rate, the insurer shall inform the applicant about the California Major Risk Medical Insurance Program (MRMIP) (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15870) of Part 3.3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) and about new coverage options and the potential for subsidized coverage through Covered California. The insurer shall direct persons seeking more information to MRMIP, Covered California,
 plan or policy representatives, insurance agents, or an entity paid by Covered California to assist with health coverage enrollment, such as a navigator or an assister.

(2) On or after July 1, 2024, if an insurer rejects a dependent of a policyholder applying to be added to the policyholder’s individual grandfathered health plan, rejects an applicant for a Medicare supplement policy due to the applicant having end-stage renal disease, or offers an individual grandfathered health plan to an applicant at a rate that is higher than the standard rate, the insurer shall inform the applicant about new coverage options and the potential for subsidized coverage through Covered California. The insurer shall direct persons seeking more information to Covered California, plan or policy representatives, insurance agents, or an entity paid by Covered California to assist with health coverage enrollment, such as a navigator or an assister.

(e) A notice provided pursuant to this section is a private and confidential communication and, at the time of application, the insurer shall give the applicant the opportunity to designate the address for receipt of the written notice in order to protect the confidentiality of personal or privileged information.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Covered California” means the California Health Benefit Exchange established pursuant to Section 100500 of the Government Code.

(2) “Grandfathered health plan” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 1251 of PPACA.

(3) “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act
 (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and rules, regulations, or guidance issued pursuant to that law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 23.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10113.95.

(a) A health insurer that issues, renews, or amends individual health insurance policies shall be subject to this section.

(b) An insurer subject to this section shall have written policies, procedures, or underwriting guidelines establishing the criteria and process whereby the insurer makes its decision to provide or to deny coverage to individuals applying for coverage and sets the rate for that coverage. These guidelines, policies, or procedures shall ensure that the plan rating and underwriting criteria comply with Sections 10140 and 10291.5 and all other applicable provisions.

(c) On or before June 1, 2006, and annually thereafter, every insurer shall
 file with the commissioner a general description of the criteria, policies, procedures, or guidelines that the insurer uses for rating and underwriting decisions related to individual health insurance policies, which means automatic declinable health conditions, health conditions that may lead to a coverage decline, height and weight standards, health history, health care utilization, lifestyle, or behavior that might result in a decline for coverage or severely limit the health insurance products for which individuals applying for coverage would be eligible. An insurer may comply with this section by submitting to the department underwriting materials or resource guides provided to agents and brokers, provided that those materials include the information required to be submitted by this section.

(d) Commencing January 1, 2011, the commissioner shall post on the department’s Internet Web site, in a manner accessible and understandable to
 consumers, general, noncompany specific information about rating and underwriting criteria and practices in the individual market and information about the California Major Risk Medical Insurance Program (Part 6.5 (commencing with Section 12700)) and the federal temporary high risk pool established pursuant to Part 6.6 (commencing with Section 12739.5). The commissioner shall develop the information for the Internet Web site in consultation with the Department of Managed Health Care to enhance the consistency of information provided to consumers. Information about individual health insurance shall also include the following notification:
“Please examine your options carefully before declining group coverage or continuation coverage, such as COBRA, that may be available to you. You should be aware that companies selling individual health insurance typically require a review of your medical history that could result in a
 higher premium or you could be denied coverage entirely.”
(e) Nothing in this section shall authorize public disclosure of company-specific rating and underwriting criteria and practices submitted to the commissioner.

(f) This section shall not apply to a closed block of business, as defined in Section 10176.10.

(g) (1) This section shall become inoperative on November 1, 2013, or the 91st calendar day following the adjournment of the 2013–14 First Extraordinary Session, whichever date is later.

(2) If Section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Section 1501 of PPACA, is repealed or amended to no longer apply to the individual market, as defined in Section 2791 of the federal
 Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-4), this section shall become operative 12 months after the date of that repeal or amendment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   (AB 2 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.   Inoperative, by its own provisions, on November 1, 2013, subject to condition for resuming operation.   See later operative version added by Sec. 2 of Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10113.95.

(a) A health insurer that renews individual grandfathered health benefit plans shall be subject to this section.

(b) An insurer subject to this section shall have written policies, procedures, or underwriting guidelines establishing the criteria and process whereby the insurer makes its decision to provide or to deny coverage to dependents applying for an individual grandfathered health benefit plan and sets the rate for that coverage. These guidelines, policies, or procedures shall ensure that the plan rating and underwriting criteria comply with Sections 10140 and 10291.5 and all other applicable provisions of state and federal law.

(c) On or before the June 1 next following the operative date of this section, and annually thereafter, every insurer shall file with the commissioner a general description of the criteria, policies, procedures, or guidelines that the insurer uses for rating and underwriting decisions related to individual grandfathered health benefit plans, which means automatic declinable health conditions, health conditions that may lead to a coverage decline, height and weight standards, health history, health care utilization, lifestyle, or behavior that might result in a decline for coverage or severely limit the health insurance products for which individuals applying for coverage would be eligible. An insurer may comply with this section by submitting to the department underwriting materials or resource guides provided to agents and brokers, provided that those materials include the information required to be submitted by this section.

(d) Nothing in this section shall authorize public disclosure of company-specific rating and underwriting criteria and practices submitted to the commissioner.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued pursuant to that law.

(2) “Grandfathered health benefit plan” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 1251 of PPACA.

(f) (1) This section shall become operative on November 1, 2013, or the 91st calendar day following the adjournment of
 the 2013–14 First Extraordinary Session, whichever date is later.

(2) If Section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Section 1501 of PPACA, is repealed or amended to no longer apply to the individual market, as defined in Section 2791 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-4), this section shall become inoperative 12 months after the date of that repeal or amendment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 2.   (AB 2 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.   Section operative November 1, 2013, by its own provisions.   Conditionally inoperative, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Upon inoperation, see the previous version, as amended by Sec. 1 of Ch. 1, which would resume operation.)
-------------------------------------------

10114.
